Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-280
Hearing; recorded; how paid.

The proceedings of the hearing requested under sections 79-268 and 79-269 shall be recorded at the expense of the school district.

Laws 1976, LB 503, § 24;

Laws 1994, LB 1250, § 30;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-4,193;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 84.